src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON a_parhain_even
+A+Sg        :%>mp^A   ess_nA        ;
+A+Sg        :%>m^A    sgpl_cases_even ;

+A+Pl        :%>mp%>i2 ess_nA        ;
+A+Pl        :%>mp%>i2 com_ne        ;
+A+Pl        :%>m%>i2  sgpl_cases_even ;
                 : a_parhain_common ;


LEXICON a_parhain
+A+Sg        :%>mp^A   ess_nnA        ;
+A+Sg        :%>m^A    sgpl_cases_odd ;

+A+Pl        :%>mp%>i2 ess_nnA        ;
+A+Pl        :%>mp%>i2 com_nne        ;
+A+Pl        :%>m%>i2  sgpl_cases_odd ;
                 : a_parhain_common ;

LEXICON a_parhain_common
+A+Sg        :             nom_n          ;
+A+Sg        :%>m^A        gen_n          ;
+A+Sg        :%>n          par_tA         ;
+A+Sg        :%>mp         ill_hAAn       ;

+A+Pl        :%>m^A        nom_t          ;
+A+Pl        :%>m          gen_mii/mitten ;
+A+Pl        :%>m          par_ppii_group ;
+A+Pl        :%>mp         ill_hiin       ; 

LEXICON a_32_as !!= * @CODE@ raskas
+A:    x_32_as ;
+A:haa comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hai superl_m_odd ;
!+A+Pl+Superl+Gen:hai%>m%>itten K ; !Variaatio? Ei ainakaan dial.

LEXICON a_32_vaka !!= * @CODE@ raskas
+A:    x_32_vaka ;
+A:haa comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hai superl_m_odd ;
!+A+Pl+Superl+Gen:hai%>m%>itten K ; !Variaatio? Ei ainakaan dial.

LEXICON a_32_paras !!= * @CODE@ vain sannaa paras varten
+A:    x_32_as ;

LEXICON vanha_a_33aes !!= * @CODE@ sinnikäs
+A:    x_32_aes ;
+A:hää comp_m_even   ; ! sinnikkhäämälä
+A:häi superl_m_even ;
! comp, superl, puuttuvat


LEXICON a_32_is !!= * @CODE@ valmis, kaunis
+A:    x_32_is ;
+A:hii comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hii superl_m_odd ;

! comp, superl, puuttuvat

LEXICON a_32_kärys !!= * @CODE@ kärys, so far this is the only word
+A:    x_32_kärys ;
+A:hyy comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hyi superl_m_odd ;


LEXICON x_32_kärys
  +Sg+Nom:%>y^WG%>s    K                 ;
  +Sg       :h%>yy        gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg       :%>y^WG%>s    par_tA            ;
  +Sg       :h%>yy        ill_sseen         ;
  +Sg       :h%>yy        sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl       :h%>yy        nom_t             ;
  +Pl       :h%>y%>i2     gen_tten          ;
  +Pl       :h%>y%>i2     par_tA            ;
  +Pl       :h%>yi        ill_ssiin         ;
  +Pl+Ess:h%>y%>i2%>ny PxxK              ; ! not to ess n pecause of the y??
  +Pl       :h%>y%>i2     com_ne            ;
  +Pl       :h%>y%>i2     sgpl_cases_even   ;


LEXICON a_32_et !!= * @CODE@ tuoret
+A:    x_32_et  ;
+A:hee comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hei superl_m_odd ;
! comp, superl, puuttuvat

LEXICON a_32_u !!= * @CODE@ vaipunu:vaipun ! perfect participle
+A+Sg       : nom_u   ;
+A: PRFPRC_OBL  ;
+A:hee comp_m_even   ;
+A:hei superl_m_even ;
!+A+Sg+Par:u%>tt^A K ;
!+A:hee vanha_x_33_t_ts_common ;
!+A+Sg+Ill:hee mTAVU_VV-ill ;
!+A+Pl+Gen:hee%>i2 gen_tten     ;
!+A+Pl:hee%>i2  com_ne;

LEXICON a_32_väsynyt !!= * @CODE@ väsyny:väsyn, so far this is the only word ! perfect participle
+A+Sg       : nom_y ;
+A: PRFPRC_OBL ;
+A:hee comp_m_even   ;
+A:hei superl_m_even ;

LEXICON a_32_nny !!= * @CODE@ hengistynny:hengistyn
+A+Sg       : nom_ny ;
+A: PRFPRC_OBL_nny ;
+A:hee comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hei superl_m_odd ;

LEXICON a_32_nnu !!= * @CODE@ ravistunnu:ravistun
+A+Sg       : nom_nu ;
+A: PRFPRC_OBL_nnu ;
+A:hee comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hei superl_m_odd ;

LEXICON a_32_lly !!= * @CODE@ käsitelly:käsitel
+A+Sg       : nom_ly ;
+A: PRFPRC_OBL_lly ;
+A:hee comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hei superl_m_odd ;

LEXICON a_32_llu !!= * @CODE@ tervettullu:tervet#tul
+A+Sg       : nom_lu ;
+A: PRFPRC_OBL_llu ;
+A:hee comp_m_odd   ;
+A:hei superl_m_odd ;

LEXICON a_22_excns !!= * @CODE@ = veres
+A:    x_22_excns   ;
+A:kse comp_m_odd   ;
+A:ksi5i superl_m_odd ; ! Do they have superl? TODO

!LEXICON a_22_excns_even !!= * @CODE@ = veres
!+A:    x_22_excns_even   ;
!+A:kse comp_m_even   ;
!+A:ksi5i superl_m_even ; ! Do they have superl? TODO

LEXICON a_22_excns_mus !!= * @CODE@ = isomus
+A:    x_22_excns_even   ;


!LEXICON vanha_a_41_s_kse
!+A:^WG # ;



LEXICON a_22_inen !!= * @CODE@ varovainen
+A:   x_22_inen    ;
+A:se comp_m_odd   ;
+A:ssi5i superl_m_odd ;


LEXICON a_22_inen_odd !!= * @CODE@ sininen
+A:   x_22_inen_odd ;
+A:se comp_mm ;
+A+Dial/Por :ssi5i superl_m_even ;

+A+Dial/Var :si5i  superl_m_even ;
+A+Dial/Var :si5   superl_mm     ;
+A+Dial/Jok :si5i  superl_m_even ;

+A+Pl+Compar+Dial/Por:se%>mm%>ii2 gen_tten ; ! +Gen:se%>mm%>ii2tten K ;
+A+Sg+Superl+Dial/Por:ssi%>in par_tA ;


LEXICON MATON !!= @CODE@ ! TODO TODO TODO ajattelemattomalle lle lla nna
  : a_22_ton_even ;


LEXICON a_22_ton_even !!= * @CODE@ muuttumaton
+A+Sg       :%>t^O          nom_n          ; ! used2be without > before n
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      gen_n_sg       ;
+A+Sg       :%>t^On         par_tA         ;
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om        ill_hAAn       ; ! used2be +Ill:%>tt^Omh^A^A n_PxK
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      ess_nA         ;
+A+Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      sgpl_cases_odd ;

+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om^A      nom_t          ;
!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Om%>i2    gen_Vn         ; ! really Vn?
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om        gen_mii/mitten_miin ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om        par_ii_group   ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om        ill_hiin       ; ! +Ill:%>tt^Omh%>i2in K
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    ess_nnA        ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    com_nne        ;
+A+Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    sgpl_cases_odd ;

+A:%>tt^Om^A comp_mm ;
+A:%>tt^Omi5i superl_m_even ;
+A+Dial/Var :%>tt^Omi5  superl_m_even ;


!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Om%>i2%>i gen_tten       ; ! muuttumattomiitten
!+A+Pl+Dial/Jok:%>tt^Om%>i2    gen_tten       ; ! muuttumattomiitten
!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Omi%>i2   par_end        ; ! muuttumattomii
!+A+Pl+Dial/Por:%>tt^Omi%>i2   par_tA         ; ! muuttumattomiita
!+A+Pl+Dial/Jok:%>tt^Om%>i2    par_A         ; ! muuttumattomia
!+A:%>tt^Omh%>i2 shorterillpl ;
!+Pl:%>tt^Om%>i2%>i a_shortestgenpl ; ! onnettomiin
! +Pl+Gen:tt^Omm%>i2in K ;
!+A+Pl+Compar+Gen:m^A%>mpp%>i2%>in K ; ! muuttumamamppiin
!+A+Pl+Superl+Gen:mi%>mpp%>i2%>in K ; ! muuttumamimppiin
! +Sg+Ill:tt^Omh^A^An K ;
!+A:%>tt^Om^A sgpl_cases_common ; ! NO SG OR PL !?!?!?!?!?!?!? wtf


LEXICON a_22_ton_odd !!= * @CODE@ onneton
+A: x_22_ton ;
+A:%>tt^Om^A comp_onneton ;
+A:%>tt^Ommi5i superl_onneton ;
+A+Dial/Var :%>tt^Ommi5 superl_onneton ;


LEXICON MATONodd !!= @CODE@ ! käymättömäle le la na ! TODO Probably not in use atm
+A: x_22_ton ;

LEXICON x_22_ton !!= * @CODE@ onneton
  +Sg       :%>t^O          nom_n             ;
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      gen_n_sg          ;
  +Sg       :%>t^On         par_tA            ;
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om        ill_hAAn          ; ! used2be +Ill:%>tt^Omh^A^A
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      ess_nA            ;
  +Sg       :%>tt^Om^A      sgpl_cases_even   ;

  +Pl       :%>tt^Om^A      nom_t             ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om        gen_mii/mitten_miin ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om        par_ii_group      ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om        ill_hiin          ; ! +Ill:%>tt^Omh%>i2in K
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    ess_nA            ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    com_ne            ;
  +Pl       :%>tt^Om%>i2    sgpl_cases_even   ;
  
  
LEXICON a_22_ton_yksi_t
+A: x_22_ton_yksi_t   ; 
+A:%>t^Om^A comp_onneton ;
+A:%>t^Ommi5i superl_onneton ;
+A+Dial/Var :%>t^Ommi5 superl_onneton ;
