src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot
veres:vere a_22_excns ; !!= * @CODE@
tyyris:tyyr a_32_is ; ! a_32_is
tuoret:tuor a_32_et ; ! vanha_a_33t -> a_32_et
tervet:terv a_32_et ; ! vanha_a_33t -> a_32_et
vaipunu:vaipun a_32_u ; ! vanha_33-> a_32_u
läpiväsyny:läpi#väsyn a_32_väsynyt ;
väsyny:väsyn a_32_väsynyt ;
vastasyntyny:vasta#syntyn a_32_väsynyt ;
syntyny:syntyn a_32_väsynyt ;
kärys:kär a_32_kärys ;
paras:par a_32_paras ; ! taivutus on hyvä: HYVA ; subleksikosta
isomus:isomu a_22_excns_mus ;
pahimus:pahimu a_22_excns_mus ;
pienimys:pienimy a_22_excns_mus ;
syvemys:syvemy a_22_excns_mus ;
vanhemus:vanhemu a_22_excns_mus ;
nuorimus:nuorimu a_22_excns_mus ;
hyperaktiivinen:hyperaktiivi a_22_inen ;
innovatiivinen:innovatiivi a_22_inen ;
roomalainen:roomalai a_22_inen ;
kahđenlainen:kahđenlai a_22_inen ;
praktilinen:praktili a_22_inen ;
yliluonolinen:yli#luonoli a_22_inen ;
uskolinen:uskoli a_22_inen ;
ei-materiaalinen:ei-materiaali a_22_inen ;
sensitiivinen:sensitiivi a_22_inen_odd ;
ei-poliittinen:ei-#poliitti a_22_inen ;
keskimäinen:keskimäi a_22_inen ;
modaalinen:modaali a_22_inen ;
koukkuselkäinen:koukkuselkäi a_22_inen_odd ;
sammuttelematon:sammuttelema a_22_ton_even ;
jumalaton:jumala a_22_ton_even ;
kokematon:kokema a_22_ton_even ;
kulkematon:kulkema a_22_ton_even ;
tuntheeton:tunthee a_22_ton_odd ;
yötön:yö a_22_ton_even ;
mittaamaton:mittaama a_22_ton_even ;
perhäänantamaton:perhäänantama a_22_ton_even ;
luottamaton:luottama a_22_ton_even ;
tuntematon:tuntema a_22_ton_even ;
vaatimaton:vaatima a_22_ton_even ;
kärsimätön:kärsimä a_22_ton_even ;
syytön:syy a_22_ton_even ;
ylipääsemätön:ylipääsemä a_22_ton_even ;
mataliin:matalii a_parhain_even ;
terrääviin:terräävii a_parhain_even ;
pohjaissiin:pohjaissii a_parhain_even ;
varhaissiin:varhaissii a_parhain_even ;
interesanttissiin:interesanttissii a_parhain ;
tavalissiin:tavalissii a_parhain ;
tähelissiin:tähelissii a_parhain ;
halviin:halvii a_parhain ;
sissiin:sissii a_parhain ;
korkkein:korkkei a_parhain ;
huonoin:huonoi a_parhain ;
ihaniin:ihanii a_parhain_even ;
uhatuin:uhatui a_parhain_even ;
makkein:makkei a_parhain ;
nuoriin:nuorii a_parhain ;
pissiin:pissii a_parhain ;
rakkhain:rakkhai a_parhain ;
syvviin:syvvii a_parhain ;
värstiin:värstii a_parhain ;
ylin:yli a_parhain ;
myrskyinen:myrkyi a_22_inen_odd ;
uuđenaikhanen:uuđenaikha a_22_inen_odd ;
nykyaikhainen:nykyaikhai a_22_inen_odd ;
monimukkainen:moni#mukkai a_22_inen_odd ;
kiimainen:kiimai a_22_inen_odd ;
monikertainen:monikertai a_22_inen_odd ;
herttainen:herttai a_22_inen_odd ;
energinen:energi a_22_inen ;
ystävällinen:ystävälli a_22_inen_odd ;
neliskanttinen:neliskantti a_22_inen_odd ;
vapaaehtonen:vapaaehto a_22_inen_odd ;
huoleton:huole a_22_ton_odd ;
puoleton:puole a_22_ton_odd ;
viaton:via a_22_ton_odd ;
vijaton:vija a_22_ton_odd ;
naimaton:naima a_22_ton_odd ;
mitäätön:mitää a_22_ton_odd ;
juureton:juure a_22_ton_odd ;
hävitön:hävi a_22_ton_odd ;
synnitön:synni a_22_ton_odd ;
levoton:levo a_22_ton_odd ;
mahđoton:mahđo a_22_ton_odd ;
alaston:alas a_22_ton_yksi_t;
lystitön:lysti a_22_ton_odd ;
pahas:pah a_32_as ;
vaka:vak a_32_vaka ;
utelias:uteli a_32_as ;
vuotias:vuot2i a_32_as ;
malmikas:malmikk a_32_as ;
innokas:innokk a_32_as ;
lohirikas:lohi#rikk a_32_as ;
voittorikas:voitto#rikk a_32_as ;
raharikas:raha#rikk a_32_as ;
halukas:halukk a_32_as ;
autuas:autu a_32_as ;
reipas:reipp a_32_as ;
itteviisas:itteviis a_32_as ;
rietas:riett a_32_as ;
sinnikäs:sinnikk vanha_a_33aes ;
rytmikäs:rytmikk vanha_a_33aes ;
kallis:kall a_32_is ;
puolivalmis:puoli#valm a_32_is ;
valmis:valm a_32_is ;
kaunis:kaun a_32_is ;
raitis:raitt a_32_is ;
tuulentivis:tuulen#tiv a_32_is ;
vesitivis:vesi#tiv a_32_is ;
tivis:tiv a_32_is ;
ahnet:ahn a_32_et ;
kađet:kat a_32_et ;
tiinet:tiin a_32_et ;
pysthöökuolu:pysthöön#kuol a_32_u ;
kuolu:kuol a_32_u ;
tervettullu:tervet#tul a_32_llu ;
käsitelly:käsitel a_32_lly ;
kokenu:koken a_32_u ;
jäljelejääny:jäljele#jään a_32_väsynyt ;
määntyny:määntyn a_32_väsynyt ;
pettyny:pettyn a_32_väsynyt ;
poissiirtyny:pois#siirtyn a_32_väsynyt ;
äskönsiirtyny:äskön#siirtyn a_32_väsynyt ;
siirtyny:siirtyn a_32_väsynyt ;
nainu:nain a_32_u ;
oppinu:oppin a_32_u ;
ahvoittunnu:ahvoittun a_32_nnu ;
engaseeraantunnu:engaseeraantun a_32_nnu ;
separeerantunnu:separeerantun a_32_nnu ;
ravistunnu:ravistun a_32_nnu ;
hermostunnu:hermostun a_32_nnu ;
harjaantunnu:harjaantun a_32_nnu ;
kauhistunnu:kauhistun a_32_nnu ;
pillaantunnu:pillaantun a_32_nnu ;
karkaistunnu:karkaistun a_32_nnu ;
varrautunnu:varrautun a_32_nnu ;
läpikulunu:läpikulun a_32_u ;
suuttunu:suuttun a_32_u ;
biseksuaalinen:bi#seksuaali a_22_inen_odd ;
eksoottinen:eksootti a_22_inen ;
hengestynny:hengestyn a_32_nny ; ! vanha_a_33u ei toimi y-päätteisillä
hengistynny:hengistyn  a_32_nny ; ! vanha_a_33u ei toimi y-päätteisillä
jähmettynny:jähmettyn a_32_nny ;
kylmettynny:kylmettyn a_32_nny ;
menettynny:menettyn a_32_nny ;
sivistynny:sivistyn a_32_nny ;
